Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.050

Duties of superintendent as secretary of the board.

In addition to the duties as prescribed in RCW 28A.400.030, the school district superintendent, as secretary of the board, may be authorized by the board to act as business manager, purchasing agent, and/or superintendent of buildings and janitors, and charged with the special care of school buildings and other property of the district, and he or she shall perform other duties as the board may direct.

[ 1990 c 33 s 344; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.070. Prior: 1919 c 90 s 8; 1909 c 97 p 291 s 7; RRS s 4796. Formerly RCW 28A.59.070, 28.62.070.]